Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.107

Applicant information for registration—Provisional registration—Exception.

(1) If the driver's license number, state identification card number, or last four digits of the social security number provided by the applicant match the information maintained by the Washington department of licensing or the social security administration, and the applicant provided all information required by RCW 29A.08.010, the applicant must be registered to vote.

(2) If the driver's license number, state identification card number, or last four digits of the social security number provided by the applicant do not match the information maintained by the Washington department of licensing or the social security administration, or if the applicant does not provide a Washington driver's license, a Washington state identification card, or a social security number, the applicant must be provisionally registered to vote. An identification notice must be sent to the voter to obtain the correct driver's license number, state identification card number, last four digits of the social security number, or one of the following forms of alternate identification:

(a) Valid photo identification;

(b) A valid enrollment card of a federally recognized Indian tribe in Washington state;

(c) A copy of a current utility bill;

(d) A current bank statement;

(e) A copy of a current government check;

(f) A copy of a current paycheck; or

(g) A government document, other than a voter registration card, that shows both the name and address of the voter.

(3) The ballot of a provisionally registered voter may not be counted until the voter provides a driver's license number, a state identification card number, or the last four digits of a social security number that matches the information maintained by the Washington department of licensing or the social security administration, or until the voter provides alternate identification. The identification must be provided no later than the day before certification of the primary or election. If the voter provides one of the forms of identification in subsection (2) of this section, the voter's registration status must be changed from provisionally registered to registered.

(4) A provisional registration must remain on the official list of registered voters through at least two general elections for federal office. If, after two general elections for federal office, the voter still has not verified his or her identity, the provisional registration may be canceled.

(5) The requirements of this section do not apply to an overseas or service voter who registers to vote by signing the return envelope of an absentee ballot, or to a registered voter transferring his or her registration.

[ 2009 c 369 s 9; 2005 c 246 s 4; 2004 c 267 s 106.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 246: See note following RCW 10.64.140.

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.